Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202286-1303
Broadband Bridge Program; created; purpose; administration; funding; legislative intent.

The Broadband Bridge Program is created. The purpose of the program is to facilitate and fund the development of broadband networks in unserved and underserved areas in addition to the reverse auction program available pursuant to section 86-330. The commission shall administer the program. It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate twenty million dollars annually from the General Fund beginning with fiscal year 2021-22 to the commission to be distributed as grants through the program and to pay for administrative costs associated with the program.

Laws 2021, LB388, § 3.